el: Ταξινόμηση περιεκτικότητας σε αγαύη: 100% Μπλε αγαύη; Mixto (51-99% αγαύη); Άλλο
it: Classificazione del contenuto dell'Agave: 100% agave blu; Mixto (51-99% agave); Altro
zh-TW: 龍舌蘭含量分類: 100% 藍色龍舌蘭; 混合龍舌蘭 (51-99% 龍舌蘭); 其他
sv: Klassificering av agaveinnehållet: 100 % blå agave; Mixto (51–99 % agave); Övrigt
cs: Klasifikace podle obsahu agáve: 100% modrá agáve; Mixto (51–99 % agáve); Ostatní
sl-SI: Razvrstitev po vsebnosti agave: 100-odstotna modra agava; Mešano (51–99-odstotna agava); Drugo
ja: アガベ（リュウゼツラン）のコンテンツ分類: 100%ブルーアガベ; ミクスト (アガベ51〜99%); その他
pt-BR: Classificação do teor de agave: 100% Agave azul; Misto (51-99% agave); Outros
es: Clasificación del contenido de agave: 100 % agave azul; Mixto (51-99 % agave); Otro
ru: Классификация по содержанию агавы: 100% синяя агава; Миксто (51–99 % агавы); Другое
da: Agave-indholdsklassificering: 100 % blå agave; Mixto (51-99 % agave); Anden
tr: Agave içerik sınıflandırması: %100 Mavi agave; Mixto (%51-99 agave); Diğer
ko: 아가베 함량 분류: 100% 블루 아가베; 믹스토(51~99% 아가베); 기타
fr: Classification de la teneur en agave: 100 % agave bleu; Mixto (51 à 99 % d’agave); Autre
hr-HR: Klasifikacija sadržaja agave: 100 % plava agava; Mixto (51 – 99 % agave); Ostalo
vi: Phân loại hàm lượng agave: 100% Blue agave; Mixto (51-99% agave); Khác
ro-RO: Clasificare conținut de agave: 100% agave albastre; Mixto (51-99% agave); Altele
nb: Agave Stoff-klassifisering: 100 % blå agave; Mixto (51–99 % agave); Annet
nl: Classificatie van agave-gehalte: 100% blauwe agave; Mixto (51-99% agave); Overig
hu: Agávétartalom szerinti besorolás: 100% kék agávé; Mixto (51–99% agávé); Egyéb
pt-PT: Classificação do conteúdo de agave: 100% agave azul; Mixto (51-99% de agave); Outro
bg-BG: Класификация на съдържанието на агаве: 100% синьо агаве; Миксто (51-99% агаве); Други
pl: Klasyfikacja zawartości agawy: 100% niebieskiej agawy; Mixto (51–99% agawy); Inne
en: Agave content classification: 100% Blue agave; Mixto (51-99% agave); Other
th: การจำแนกประเภทตามสัดส่วนอะกาเว: บลูอากาเว่ 100%; Mixto (อากาเว่ 51-99%); อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Klasifikácia agáve Obsah: 100 % modrá agáva; Mixto (51 – 99 % agávy); Iné
de: Einstufung des Agavenanteils: 100 % Blaue Agave; Mixto (51–99 % Agave); Andere
lt-LT: Agavų kiekio klasifikacija: 100 % mėlynoji agava; „Mixto“ (51–99 % agavos); Kita
fi: Agaavepitoisuusluokitus: 100 % sinistä agavea; Mixto (51–99 % agavea); Muu
zh-CN: 龙舌兰含量分类: 100% 蓝色龙舌兰; 混合（51-99% 龙舌兰）; 其他